Washington statutes.
RCW 15.70.020

Director may delegate certain powers to secretary of agriculture.

The director of agriculture is authorized, in his or her discretion, to enter into agreements with the secretary of agriculture of the United States pursuant to section 2(f) of the aforesaid act of the congress of the United States, upon such terms and conditions and for such periods of time as may be mutually agreeable, authorizing the secretary of agriculture of the United States to accept, administer, expend, and use in the state of Washington all or any part of such trust assets or any other funds of the state of Washington which may be appropriated for such uses for carrying out the purposes of titles I and II of the Bankhead-Jones farm tenant act, in accordance with the applicable provisions of title IV thereof, as now or hereafter amended, and to do any and all things necessary to effectuate and carry out the purposes of said agreements.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6097; 1961 c 11 s 15.70.020. Prior: 1951 c 169 s 2.]